North Carolina, session 2025, HB662.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. RETAIN AND ATTRACT MEMBERS OF THE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL

PROVIDE COMPENSATION INCREASES TO MEMBERS OF THE STATE
HIGHWAY PATROL
SECTION 1.1.(a) Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General
Fund to the Reserve for Compensation Increases to provide pay raises for the State Highway
Patrol & Law Enforcement Support Staff the sum of forty million four hundred eighty-two
thousand four hundred eighty dollars ($40,482,480) in each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to establish the pay scales set forth in this section.
SECTION 1.1.(b) Effective July 1, 2025, the law enforcement officers of the State
Highway Patrol shall be paid based upon the following experience-based annual salary schedule:
Years of Experience 2025-2027 Biennium
0 $56,000
1 $62,125
2 $68,250
3 $75,375
4 $80,500
5 $86,625
6 $92,750
7 $98,875
8+ $105,000
SECTION 1.1.(c) Effective July 1, 2025, sworn State Highway Patrol employees
who are not subject to an experience-based annual salary schedule shall be paid at the following
rates by rank:
Rank 2025-2027 Biennium
Sergeant $120,750
*H662-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
First Sergeant $132,825
Lieutenant $146,108
Captain $160,718
Major $176,790
Lieutenant Colonel $194,469
Deputy Commander $204,193
Colonel $224,612

ALLOW MEMBERS OF THE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL TO WORK OTHER JOBS
SECTION 1.2.(a) The Commander of the State Highway Patrol shall develop and
maintain secondary employment policies that allow members of the State Highway Patrol to
engage in permanent or temporary secondary employment so long as that employment meets
each of the following criteria:
(1) It will not have an adverse effect on the member's work or performance with
the State Highway Patrol or on the mission of the State Highway Patrol.
(2) It will not create a conflict of interest with the member's job description or
performance with the State Highway Patrol.
SECTION 1.2.(b) The policies created pursuant to this section shall allow members
with an active, non-probationary law enforcement certification to perform secondary
employment that utilizes that certification, so long as the employment does not otherwise conflict
with the secondary employment policies.
SECTION 1.2.(c) The policies created pursuant to this section shall be completed
by July 1, 2025.

ENCOURAGE RETIRED MEMBERS OF THE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL TO
RETURN TO SERVICE WITH THE STATE
SECTION 1.3. No later than January 1, 2026, the State Highway Patrol shall
evaluate and update any internal hiring policies or practices to ensure that those hiring policies
or practices encourage the return to work of retired members of the State Highway Patrol in a
manner that does not impact the retired members' retirement allowances, to the extent allowed
by State law, including under Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.

PART II. SUPPORT FOR THE WORK OF THE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL

FUND BULLETPROOF GLASS IN VEHICLES OF STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT
OFFICERS
SECTION 2.1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Highway
Patrol the sum of three million two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($3,250,000) in recurring funds
and twenty million one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($20,150,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to purchase, install, and maintain bulletproof glass on all
State Highway Patrol vehicles.
SECTION 2.1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Highway
Patrol the sum of two hundred twenty-one thousand dollars ($221,000) in recurring funds and
one million three hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars ($1,378,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used to purchase, install, and maintain bulletproof glass on all
State Capitol Police vehicles.
SECTION 2.1.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

FUNDS TO SUPPORT HUNTERSVILLE STATE HIGHWAY PATROL STATION
SECTION 2.2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the State Highway
Patrol the sum of six hundred forty-three thousand one hundred fifty dollars ($643,150) in
Page 2 House Bill 662-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be used for the following purposes at the
State Highway Patrol Station in Huntersville, North Carolina:
(1) Six hundred forty thousand dollars ($640,000) for fuel infrastructure to
include an above-ground storage tank, fuel dispenser, FuelMaster Live
functionality, and a concrete island with an awning, lights, and electrical
outlets.
(2) Three thousand dollars ($3,000) for an air compressor for filling tires to be
located on the concrete island funded in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
(3) One hundred fifty dollars ($150.00) for a vehicle vacuum to be located on the
concrete island funded in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
SECTION 2.2.(b) The State Highway Patrol shall enter into a memorandum of
agreement with the Department of Transportation for the creation, use, and maintenance of the
items funded by this section.
SECTION 2.2.(c) This section becomes effective July 1, 2025.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 662-First Edition Page 3